src/morphology/chr.all.lexc
LEXICON Verb_Prefixes_Int2
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮨ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭿ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮳ "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮻ 0:Ꭶ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮹ "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮝ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮧ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ᏺ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮼ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭳ 0:Ꭹ "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮣ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭲ 0:Ꮵ "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Present_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Habitual_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮫ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Future_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_FutImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RemPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_RepPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭰ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_ImmPast_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꮹ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_PresImp_Int2 ;
< 0:Ꭴ 0:Ꮒ "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > Stems_Infinitive_Int2 ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_ha
+V+Pres:Ꭽ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_ga
+V+Pres:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Present_a
! +V+Pres:a  PersonFeatures ;
+V+Pres:Ꭰ  PersonFeatures ;
! +V+Pres:D  PersonFeatures ; ! Checking how this works

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_hoi
+V+Hab:ᎰᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_goi
+V+Hab:ᎪᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Habitual_sgoi
+V+Hab:ᏍᎪᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_tli
+V+Fut:Ꮯ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_si
+V+Fut:Ꮟ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_hi
+V+Fut:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_i
+V+Fut:Ꭲ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Future_li
+V+Fut:Ꮅ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_tlvi
+V+FutImp:ᏢᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_svi
+V+FutImp:ᏒᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_hvi
+V+FutImp:ᎲᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_vi
+V+FutImp:ᎥᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_FutImp_lvi
+V+FutImp:ᎸᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_tlvi
+V+RemPast:ᏢᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_svi
+V+RemPast:ᏒᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_hvi
+V+RemPast:ᎲᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_vi
+V+RemPast:ᎥᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RemPast_lvi
+V+RemPast:ᎸᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_tlei
+V+RepPast:ᏞᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_sei
+V+RepPast:ᏎᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_hei
+V+RepPast:ᎮᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_ei
+V+RepPast:ᎡᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_RepPast_lei
+V+RepPast:ᎴᎢ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ga
+V+ImmPast:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_hi
+V+ImmPast:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ta
+V+ImmPast:Ꮤ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_da
+V+ImmPast:Ꮣ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_na
+V+ImmPast:Ꮎ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_ga
+V+PresImp:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_hi
+V+PresImp:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_ta
+V+PresImp:Ꮤ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_da
+V+PresImp:Ꮣ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_PresImp_na
+V+PresImp:Ꮎ  PersonFeatures ;

! LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_ga
! +V+ImmPast:Ꭶ  PersonFeatures ;

! LEXICON Suffix_ImmPast_hi
! +V+ImmPast:Ꭿ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Infinitive_sdi
+V+Inf:ᏍᏗ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON Suffix_Infinitive_di
+V+Inf:Ꮧ  PersonFeatures ;

LEXICON PersonFeatures

< "+1sg":0 "@U.personprefix.1sg@" > # ;
< "+2dl":0 "@U.personprefix.2dl@" > # ;
< "+2pl":0 "@U.personprefix.2pl@" > # ;
< "+2sg":0 "@U.personprefix.2sg@" > # ;
< "+3sg":0 "@U.personprefix.3sg@" > # ;
< "+3pl":0 "@U.personprefix.3pl@" > # ;
< "+Edl":0 "@U.personprefix.Edl@" > # ;
< "+Epl":0 "@U.personprefix.Epl@" > # ;
< "+Idl":0 "@U.personprefix.Idl@" > # ;
< "+Ipl":0 "@U.personprefix.Ipl@" > # ;
!! Adjectives
!! ----------
!! Adjectives in UNDEFINED language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Nouns
!! -----
!! Nouns in UNDEFINED language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
noun    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Numerals
!! --------
!! Numerals in UNDEFINED language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
numeral    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Prefixes
!! --------
!! Prefixes in UNDEFINED language are bound to beginning of other words.

! LEXICON Prefixes
! nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
! verbprefix-     Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Pronouns
!! --------
!! Pronouns in UNDEFINED language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Verbs
!! -----
!! Verbs in CHEROKEE language are actions.

LEXICON Stems_Present_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᏍ Suffix_Present_ga ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏘ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏘ Suffix_Present_ha ;

LEXICON Stems_Habitual_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᏍ Suffix_Habitual_goi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏘ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏘ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;

LEXICON Stems_Future_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_Future_tli ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_Future_tli ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_Future_si ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_Future_hi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_Future_hi ;

LEXICON Stems_FutImp_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_FutImp_tlvi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_FutImp_tlvi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_FutImp_svi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_FutImp_hvi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_FutImp_hvi ;

LEXICON Stems_RemPast_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_RemPast_tlvi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_RemPast_tlvi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_RemPast_svi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_RemPast_hvi ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_RemPast_hvi ;

LEXICON Stems_RepPast_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_RepPast_tlei ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_RepPast_tlei ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_RepPast_sei ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_RepPast_hei ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_RepPast_hei ;

LEXICON Stems_ImmPast_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_ImmPast_hi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩ Suffix_ImmPast_ta ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩ Suffix_ImmPast_ta ;

LEXICON Stems_PresImp_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:Ꮓ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣ Suffix_PresImp_hi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩ Suffix_PresImp_ta ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩ Suffix_PresImp_ta ;

LEXICON Stems_Infinitive_Int1
ᎦᏃᎯᎭ:ᏃᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᏁᏦᎯᎭ:ᏁᏦᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎶᎣᏍᎦ:ᎶᎣᎯ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎾᏩᏘᎭ:ᎾᏩᏛ Suffix_Infinitive_di ;
ᎦᏁᏩᏘᎭ:ᏁᏩᏛ Suffix_Infinitive_di ;

LEXICON Stems_Present_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Present_a ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Present_ha ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Present_a ;

LEXICON Stems_Habitual_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Habitual_hoi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Habitual_sgoi ;

LEXICON Stems_Future_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_Future_i ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Future_li ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Future_si ;

LEXICON Stems_FutImp_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_FutImp_vi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_FutImp_lvi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_FutImp_svi ;

LEXICON Stems_RemPast_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_RemPast_vi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_RemPast_lvi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_RemPast_svi ;

LEXICON Stems_RepPast_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_RepPast_ei ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_RepPast_lei ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_RepPast_sei ;

LEXICON Stems_ImmPast_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_ImmPast_ga ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:Ꮒ Suffix_ImmPast_da ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_ImmPast_na ;

LEXICON Stems_PresImp_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ꮿ Suffix_PresImp_ga ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:Ꮒ Suffix_PresImp_da ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_PresImp_na ;

LEXICON Stems_Infinitive_Int2
ᎦᏰᎠ:Ᏸ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᏂᏙᎭ:ᏂᏙ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;
ᎦᎧᎲᎠ:ᎧᎲ Suffix_Infinitive_sdi ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
